Utah statutes.
78B-6-521.   Sale of property acquired by eminent domain.
(1)  As used in this section, "condemnation or threat of condemnation" means:
(a)  acquisition through an eminent domain proceeding; or
(b)  an official body of the state or a subdivision of the state, having the
power of eminent domain, has specifically authorized the use of eminent domain
to acquire the real property.
(2)  If the state or one of its subdivisions, at its sole discretion, declares
real property that is acquired through condemnation or threat of condemnation
to be surplus real property, it may not sell the real property on the open
market unless:
(a)  the real property has been offered for sale to the original grantor, at
the highest offer made to the state or one of its subdivisions with first
right of refusal being given to the original grantor;
(b)  the original grantor expressly waived in writing the first right of
refusal on the offer or failed to accept the offer within 90 days after
notification by registered mail to the last-known address; and
(c)  neither the state nor the subdivision of the state selling the property
is involved in the rezoning of the property or the acquisition of additional
property to enhance the value of the real property to be sold.
(3)  This section shall only apply to property acquired after July 1, 1983.
